Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1529
Teachers and school nurses; additional contract rights; not affected.

This section and section 85-1528 shall be construed as providing a minimum standard and not as repealing any rule, regulation, order, or other action of a board that provides for additional contract rights pertaining to the same subject matter.

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 51.